Alabama, session 2026rs, SB203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
33 Section 1. Sections 13A-6-43, 13A-6-44, 13A-6-68,
34 13A-6-111, 13A-6-124, and 13A-6-243, Code of Alabama 1975, are
35 amended to read as follows:
36 "§13A-6-43
37 (a) A person commits the crime of kidnapping in the
38 first degree if he or she abducts another person with intent
39 to do any of the following:
40 (1) Hold him or her for ransom or reward; or.
41 (2) Use him or her as a shield or hostage; or.
42 (3) Accomplish or aid the commission of any felony or
43 flight therefrom; or.
44 (4) Inflict physical injury upon him or her, or to
45 violate or abuse him or her sexually; or.
46 (5) Terrorize him or her or a third person; or.
47 (6) Interfere with the performance of any governmental
48 or political function.
49 (b) A person does not commit the crime of kidnapping in
50 the first degree if he voluntarily releases the victim alive,
51 and not suffering from serious physical injury, in a safe
52 place prior to apprehension. The burden of injecting the issue
53 of voluntary safe release is on the defendant, but this does
54 not shift the burden of proof. This subsection does not apply
55 to a prosecution for or preclude a conviction of kidnapping in
56 the second degree or any other crime.
Page 2

the second degree or any other crime.
SB203 Enrolled
57 (c)(b) Kidnapping in the first degree is a Class A
58 felony."
59 "§13A-6-44
60 (a) A person commits the crime of kidnapping in the
61 second degree if he or she abducts another person using, or
62 with the intent to use, deception, physical force, or deadly
63 physical force.
64 (b) A person does not commit a crime under this section
65 if:
66 (1) The abduction is not coupled with intent to use or
67 to threaten to use deadly force,
68 (2) The actor is a relative of the person abducted, and
69 (3) The(b)(1) It is an affirmative defense to a
70 violation of this section if the actor's sole purpose is to
71 assume lawful control of that person.
72 (2) The burden of injecting the issue of defense under
73 this subsection is on the defendant, but this does not shift
74 the burden of proof.
75 (c) Kidnapping in the second degree is a Class B
76 felony."
77 "§13A-6-68
78 (a) A person commits the crime of indecent exposure if,
79 with intent to arouse or gratify sexual desire of himself or
80 herself, or of any person other than his or her spouse, he or
81 she exposes his or her genitals under circumstances in which
82 he or she knows the conduct is likely to cause affront or
83 alarm.
84 (b)(1) Indecent exposure is a Class A misdemeanor
Page 3

(b)(1) Indecent exposure is a Class A misdemeanor
SB203 Enrolled
85 except a third or subsequent conviction shall be.
86 (2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1), indecent exposure
87 is a Class C felony under either of the following
88 circumstances:
89 a. If any victim of the offense is under 12 years of
90 age.
91 b. If the person has two or more prior convictions
92 under this article."
93 "§13A-6-111
94 (a) A person is guilty of transmitting obscene material
95 to a child if the person transmits to a child, or another
96 person believed by the defendant to be a child, by means of
97 any cellular device, online application, computer
98 communication system allowing the input, output, examination,
99 or transfer of computer programs from one computer to another,
100 or any other electronic means, material which, in whole or in
101 part, depicts actual or simulated nudity, sexual conduct, or
102 sadomasochistic abuse, for the purpose of initiating or
103 engaging in sexual acts sexual conduct pursuant to Section
104 13A-12-200.1, sexual performance, or a sex offense pursuant to
105 Section 15-20A-5 with the child.
106 (b) For the purposes of this section, a "child"
107 includes any person under 17 years of age.
108 (c) For purposes of determining jurisdiction, the
109 offense is committed in this state if the transmission that
110 constitutes the offense either originates in this state or is
111 received in this state and shall be considered to be committed
112 in any county in which any part of the crime took place or in
Page 4

in any county in which any part of the crime took place or in
SB203 Enrolled
113 the county of residence of the victim or defendant.
114 (d) A person charged under this section shall be tried
115 as an adult and the record of the proceeding shall not be
116 sealed nor subject to expungement.
117 (e) It shall not be a defense to prosecution under this
118 section that an undercover operative or law enforcement
119 officer was involved in the detection and investigation of an
120 offense.
121 (f)(e) Transmitting obscene material of engaging in
122 sexual intercourse, sodomy, or to engage in a sexual
123 performance, obscene sexual performance, or sexual conduct for
124 his or her benefit to a child A violation of this section is a
125 Class B felony."
126 "§13A-6-124
127 (a) Any person who travels either within this state, to
128 this state, or from this state by any means, who attempts to
129 do so, or who knowingly causes another to do so or to attempt
130 to do so for the purpose of engaging in any unlawful sex act
131 with a child, or another person believed by the defendant to
132 be a child, including sexual intercourse, sodomy, a sexual
133 conduct pursuant to Section 13A-12-200.1, sexual performance,
134 obscene sexual performance, or other sexual conduct or a sex
135 offense pursuant to Section 15-20A-5 for his or her benefit or
136 for the benefit of another shall be guilty of traveling to
137 meet a child for an unlawful sex act.
138 (b) Any person who violates this section commits a
139 Class A felony. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a
140 conviction under this section shall be considered a criminal
Page 5

conviction under this section shall be considered a criminal
SB203 Enrolled
141 sex offense under Section 15-20-21."
142 "§13A-6-243
143 (a)(1) A person commits the crime of directing a child
144 to engage in sexual intercourse or sodomy if he or she
145 knowingly entices, allures, persuades, induces, or directs any
146 person under the age of 12 years of the following to engage in
147 sexual intercourse or sodomy with another person:
148 a. A child under 12 years of age.
149 b. A child 12 or more years of age, but less than 16
150 years of age, provided the child is two or more years younger
151 than the other person.
152 (2) Directing a child to engage in sexual intercourse
153 or sodomy is a Class A felony.
154 (b)(1) A person commits the crime of directing a child
155 to engage in sexual contact if he or she knowingly entices,
156 allures, persuades, induces, or directs any person under the
157 age of 12 years of the following to engage in sexual contact
158 with another person:
159 a. A child under 12 years of age.
160 b. A child 12 or more years of age, but less than 16
161 years of age, provided the child is two or more years younger
162 than the other person.
163 (2) A violation of this sectionDirecting a child to
164 engage in sexual contact is a Class B felony."
165 Section 2. It shall not be a defense to prosecution
166 under Article 6 of Chapter 6 of Title 13A, Code of Alabama
167 1975, that an undercover operative or law enforcement officer
168 was involved in the detection and investigation of an offense.
Page 6

was involved in the detection and investigation of an offense.
SB203 Enrolled
169 Section 3. Sections 15-20A-5 and 15-25-31, Code of
170 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
171 "§15-20A-5
172 For the purposes of this chapter, a sex offense
173 includes any of the following offenses:
174 (1) Rape in the first degree, as provided by Section
175 13A-6-61.
176 (2) Rape in the second degree, as provided by Section
177 13A-6-62. A juvenile sex offender adjudicated delinquent of a
178 violation of rape in the second degree is presumed to be
179 exempt from this chapter after the juvenile has been counseled
180 on the dangers of the conduct for which he or she was
181 adjudicated delinquent unless the sentencing court makes a
182 determination that the juvenile sex offender is to be subject
183 to this chapter.
184 (3) Sodomy in the first degree, as provided by Section
185 13A-6-63.
186 (4) Sodomy in the second degree, as provided by Section
187 13A-6-64. A juvenile sex offender adjudicated delinquent of a
188 violation of sodomy in the second degree is presumed to be
189 exempt from this chapter after the juvenile has been counseled
190 on the dangers of the conduct for which he or she was
191 adjudicated delinquent unless the sentencing court makes a
192 determination that the juvenile sex offender is to be subject
193 to this chapter.
194 (5) Sexual misconduct, as provided by Section 13A-6-65,
195 provided that on a first conviction or adjudication the sex
196 offender is only subject to registration and verification
Page 7

offender is only subject to registration and verification
SB203 Enrolled
197 pursuant to this chapter. On a second or subsequent conviction
198 or adjudication of a sex offense, if the second or subsequent
199 conviction or adjudication does not arise out of the same set
200 of facts and circumstances as the first conviction or
201 adjudication of a sex offense, the sex offender shall comply
202 with all requirements of this chapter. A juvenile sex offender
203 adjudicated delinquent of a violation of sexual misconduct is
204 presumed to be exempt from this chapter after the juvenile has
205 been counseled on the dangers of the conduct for which he or
206 she was adjudicated delinquent unless the sentencing court
207 makes a determination that the juvenile sex offender is to be
208 subject to this chapter.
209 (6) Sexual torture, as provided by Section 13A-6-65.1.
210 (7) Sexual abuse in the first degree, as provided by
211 Section 13A-6-66.
212 (8) Sexual abuse in the second degree, as provided by
213 Section 13A-6-67.
214 (9) Indecent exposure, as provided by Section 13A-6-68,
215 provided that on a first conviction or adjudication of a sex
216 offense, the sex offender is only subject to registration and
217 verification pursuant to this chapter. On a second or
218 subsequent conviction or adjudication of a sex offense, if the
219 second or subsequent conviction or adjudication does not arise
220 out of the same set of facts and circumstances as the first
221 conviction or adjudication, the sex offender shall comply with
222 all requirements of this chapter. A juvenile sex offender
223 adjudicated of a violation of indecent exposure is presumed to
224 be exempt from this chapter after the juvenile has been
Page 8

be exempt from this chapter after the juvenile has been
SB203 Enrolled
225 counseled on the dangers of the conduct for which he or she
226 was adjudicated delinquent unless the sentencing court makes a
227 determination that the juvenile sex offender is to be subject
228 to this chapter.
229 (10) Enticing a child to enter a vehicle, room, house,
230 office, or other place for immoral purposes, as provided by
231 Section 13A-6-69.
232 (11) Sexual abuse of a child less than 12 years old, as
233 provided by Section 13A-6-69.1.
234 (12) Promoting prostitution in the first degree, as
235 provided by Section 13A-12-111.
236 (13) Promoting prostitution in the second degree, as
237 provided by Section 13A-12-112.
238 (14) Violation of the Alabama Child Pornography Act, as
239 provided by Section 13A-12-191, 13A-12-192, 13A-12-196, or
240 13A-12-197. A juvenile sex offender adjudicated delinquent of
241 a violation of the Alabama Child Pornography Act is presumed
242 to be exempt from this chapter after the juvenile has been
243 counseled on the dangers of the conduct for which he or she
244 was adjudicated delinquent unless the sentencing court makes a
245 determination that the juvenile sex offender is to be subject
246 to this chapter.
247 (15) Unlawful imprisonment in the first degree, as
248 provided by Section 13A-6-41, if the victim of the offense is
249 a minor, and the record of adjudication or conviction reflects
250 the intent of the unlawful imprisonment was to abuse the minor
251 sexually.
252 (16) Unlawful imprisonment in the second degree, as
Page 9

(16) Unlawful imprisonment in the second degree, as
SB203 Enrolled
253 provided by Section 13A-6-42, if the victim of the offense is
254 a minor, and the record of adjudication or conviction reflects
255 the intent of the unlawful imprisonment was to abuse the minor
256 sexually.
257 (17) Kidnapping in the first degree, as provided by
258 subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of Section 13A-6-43, if the
259 intent of the abduction is to violate or abuse the victim
260 sexually.
261 (18) Kidnapping of a minor, except by a parent,
262 guardian, or custodian, as provided by Section 13A-6-43 or
263 13A-6-44.
264 (19) Incest, as provided by Section 13A-13-3.
265 (20) Transmitting obscene material to a child by
266 computer, as provided by Section 13A-6-111.
267 (21) School employee engaging in a sex act or deviant
268 sexual intercourse with a student, or having sexual contact or
269 soliciting a sex act or sexual contact with a student, as
270 provided by Sections 13A-6-81 and 13A-6-82.
271 (22) Foster parent engaging in a sex act, having sexual
272 contact, or soliciting a sex act or sexual contact with a
273 foster child, as provided by Section 13A-6-71.
274 (23) Facilitating solicitation of unlawful sexual
275 conduct with a child, as provided by Section 13A-6-121.
276 (24) Electronic solicitation of a child, as provided by
277 Section 13A-6-122.
278 (25) Facilitating the on-line solicitation of a child,
279 as provided by Section 13A-6-123.
280 (26) Traveling to meet a child for an unlawful sex act,
Page 10

(26) Traveling to meet a child for an unlawful sex act,
SB203 Enrolled
281 as provided by Section 13A-6-124.
282 (27) Facilitating the travel of a child for an unlawful
283 sex act, as provided by Section 13A-6-125.
284 (28) Human trafficking in the first degree, as provided
285 by Section 13A-6-152, provided that the offense involves
286 sexual servitude.
287 (29) Human trafficking in the second degree, as
288 provided by Section 13A-6-153, provided that the offense
289 involves sexual servitude.
290 (30) Custodial sexual misconduct, as provided by
291 Section 14-11-31.
292 (31) Sexual extortion, as provided by Section
293 13A-6-241.
294 (32) Directing a child to engage in a sex act, as
295 provided in Section 13A-6-243.
296 (33) Voyeurism in the first degree, as provided in
297 Section 13A-11-41.
298 (33)(34) Any offense which is the same as or equivalent
299 to any offense set forth above as the same existed and was
300 defined under the laws of this state existing at the time of
301 such conviction, specifically including, but not limited to,
302 crime against nature, as provided by Section 13-1-110; rape,
303 as provided by Sections 13-1-130 and 13-1-131; carnal
304 knowledge of a woman or girl, as provided by Sections 13-1-132
305 through 13-1-135, or attempting to do so, as provided by
306 Section 13-1-136; indecent molestation of children, as defined
307 and provided by Section 13-1-113; indecent exposure, as
308 provided by Section 13-1-111; incest, as provided by Section
Page 11

provided by Section 13-1-111; incest, as provided by Section
SB203 Enrolled
309 13-8-3; offenses relative to obscene prints and literature, as
310 provided by Sections 13-7-160 through 13-7-175, inclusive;
311 employing, harboring, procuring or using a girl over 10 and
312 under 18 years of age for the purpose of prostitution or
313 sexual intercourse, as provided by Section 13-7-1; seduction,
314 as defined and provided by Section 13-1-112; a male person
315 peeping into a room occupied by a female, as provided by
316 Section 13-6-6; assault with intent to ravish, as provided by
317 Section 13-1-46; and soliciting a child by computer, as
318 provided by Section 13A-6-110.
319 (34)(35) Any solicitation, attempt, or conspiracy to
320 commit any of the offenses listed in subdivisions (1) to
321 (33)(34), inclusive.
322 (35)(36) Any crime committed in Alabama or any other
323 state, the District of Columbia, any United States territory,
324 or a federal, military, Indian, or foreign country
325 jurisdiction which, if it had been committed in this state
326 under the current provisions of law, would constitute an
327 offense listed in subdivisions (1) to (34)(35), inclusive.
328 (36)(37) Any offense specified by Title I of the
329 federal Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006
330 (Pub. L. 109-248, the Sex Offender Registration and
331 Notification Act (SORNA)).
332 (37)(38) Any crime committed in another state, the
333 District of Columbia, any United States territory, or a
334 federal, military, Indian, or foreign country jurisdiction if
335 that jurisdiction also requires that anyone convicted of that
336 crime register as a sex offender in that jurisdiction.
Page 12

crime register as a sex offender in that jurisdiction.
SB203 Enrolled
337 (38)(39) Any offender determined in any jurisdiction to
338 be a sex offender shall be considered a sex offender in this
339 state.
340 (39)(40) The foregoing notwithstanding, any crime
341 committed in any jurisdiction which, irrespective of the
342 specific description or statutory elements thereof, is in any
343 way characterized or known as rape, carnal knowledge, sodomy,
344 sexual assault, sexual battery, criminal sexual conduct,
345 criminal sexual contact, sexual abuse, continuous sexual
346 abuse, sexual torture, solicitation of a child, enticing or
347 luring a child, child pornography, lewd and lascivious
348 conduct, taking indecent liberties with a child, molestation
349 of a child, criminal sexual misconduct, video voyeurism, or
350 there has been a finding of sexual motivation.
351 (40)(41) Any crime not listed in this section wherein
352 the underlying felony is an element of the offense and listed
353 in subdivisions (1) to (39)(40), inclusive.
354 (41)(42) Any other offense not provided for in this
355 section wherein there is a finding of sexual motivation as
356 provided by Section 15-20A-6."
357 "§15-25-31
358 An out-of-court statement made by a witness or a victim
359 who is a child under 12 18 years of age at the time the
360 statement is made, or by a protected person as defined in
361 Section 15-25-1, concerning an act that is a material element
362 of any crime involving a physical offense, sexual offense, or
363 violent offense, as defined in Section 15-25-39, which
364 statement is not otherwise admissible in evidence, is
Page 13

statement is not otherwise admissible in evidence, is
SB203 Enrolled
365 admissible in evidence in criminal any court proceedings, if
366 the requirements of Section 15-25-32 are met. "
367 Section 4. (a) As used in this section, the following
368 terms have the following meanings:
369 (1) EMPLOYEE. Any individual who is an employee,
370 contractual employee, or volunteer at an inpatient substance
371 use disorder treatment program or inpatient mental health
372 facility and who has the responsibility for the care,
373 treatment, control, or supervision of patients in the
374 facility.
375 (2) PATIENT. Any individual who is a patient in an
376 inpatient substance use disorder treatment program, where the
377 individual is not allowed unsupervised access to the public,
378 or who is committed to an inpatient mental health facility.
379 (3) SEXUAL CONDUCT. The term as defined in Section
380 14-11-30, Code of Alabama 1975.
381 (b) A person commits the crime of inpatient custodial
382 sexual misconduct if the person is an employee and solicits or
383 engages in sexual conduct with any other person who is a
384 patient at an inpatient substance use disorder treatment
385 facility or committed to an inpatient mental health facility
386 pursuant to Article 1, Chapter 52, Title 22, Code of Alabama
387 1975.
388 (c) A violation of this section is a Class C felony.
389 (d)(1) It is the public policy of the state to prohibit
390 without exception all inpatient custodial sexual misconduct.
391 (2) For purposes of prosecution under this section,
392 consent is not a defense and the issue of whether a patient in
Page 14

consent is not a defense and the issue of whether a patient in
SB203 Enrolled
393 an inpatient substance use disorder treatment program or
394 inpatient mental health facility consented to any sexual
395 conduct is immaterial.
396 Section 5. Sections 12-21-148, 15-20A-6, and 15-20A-44,
397 Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to make conforming changes
398 as follows:
399 "§12-21-148
400 (a) For the purposes of this section, the following
401 terms shall have the following meanings:
402 (1) CERTIFIED FACILITY DOG. A trained working dog that
403 is a graduate of an assistance dog organization, a nonprofit
404 organization that sets standards of training for the health,
405 welfare, task work, and oversight for assistance dogs and
406 their handlers, and shall have at a minimum all of the
407 following:
408 a. Two years of training and must have passed the same
409 public-access test as a service dog.
410 b. Documentation showing that the certified facility
411 dog has graduated from an assistance dog organization.
412 c. A current annual certificate of health from an
413 Alabama veterinarian.
414 d. Proof of liability insurance in the minimum amount
415 of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
416 (2) CERTIFIED HANDLER. A certified handler who has
417 received training from an assistance dog organization and has
418 received training on the protocols and policies of legal
419 proceedings and the role of the certified facility dog and
420 certified handler to assure there is no interference with the
Page 15

certified handler to assure there is no interference with the
SB203 Enrolled
421 collection of evidence and testimony, or the administration of
422 justice.
423 (b) In a legal proceeding, to reduce the stress of a
424 witness and to enhance the ability of the court to obtain full
425 and accurate testimony, the court may allow a certified
426 facility dog to accompany a victim or witness while
427 testifying, or in other court proceedings, if a certified
428 facility dog is available.
429 (c) If the court, in its sole discretion, grants the
430 use of a certified facility dog, and a jury has been empaneled
431 in the legal proceeding, the certified facility dog shall be
432 accompanied by the certified handler to the witness stand with
433 the witness outside of the presence of the jury, and the
434 certified handler shall return to his or her position in the
435 courtroom within view of the witness stand. Subsequently, the
436 jury shall be seated and the court shall instruct the jury on
437 the presence of the certified facility dog and that the
438 presence of a certified facility dog should not create any
439 prejudice to any party.
440 (d) During trial proceedings, all precautions should be
441 taken to obscure the presence of the dog from the jury.
442 (e) Markings identifying the dog as a certified
443 facility dog while working must be visible.
444 (f) Subject to the Alabama Rules of Criminal Procedure,
445 if requested by either party in a legal proceeding, the court
446 may examine and confirm the credentials of the certified
447 facility dog and certified handler.
448 (g) Prior to the use of a certified facility dog in a
Page 16

(g) Prior to the use of a certified facility dog in a
SB203 Enrolled
449 court proceeding, the state or moving party must file a notice
450 of intent to use the registered therapy certified facility
451 dog."
452 "§15-20A-6
453 (a)(1) The indictment, count in the indictment,
454 information, complaint, or warrant charging the offense may
455 include a specification of sexual motivation or the
456 prosecuting attorney may file an allegation of sexual
457 motivation in any criminal case classified as a felony or
458 Class A misdemeanor if sufficient admissible evidence exists
459 that would justify a finding of sexual motivation by a
460 reasonable and objective finder of fact.
461 (2) If a specification is included in the indictment,
462 count in the indictment, information, complaint, or warrant
463 charging the offense, the specification shall be stated at the
464 end of the body of the indictment, count in the indictment,
465 information, complaint, or warrant and shall be in
466 substantially the following form: "SPECIFICATION or
467 SPECIFICATION TO THE FIRST COUNT. The Grand Jurors (or insert
468 appropriate name) further find and specify that the offender
469 committed the offense with a sexual motivation."
470 (3) If the prosecuting attorney files an allegation of
471 sexual motivation, it shall be filed within a reasonable time
472 after indictment to give sufficient notice to the defendant.
473 (b) If the indictment, count of the indictment,
474 information, complaint, or warrant charging the offense
475 includes a specification of sexual motivation or if the
476 prosecuting attorney files an allegation of sexual motivation,
Page 17

prosecuting attorney files an allegation of sexual motivation,
SB203 Enrolled
477 the state shall prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the
478 defendant committed the offense with a sexual motivation.
479 (c) The court shall make a written finding of fact, to
480 be made part of the record upon conviction or adjudication as
481 a youthful offender, of whether or not a sexual motivation was
482 present at the time of the commission of the offense unless
483 the defendant has a trial by jury.
484 (d) If a defendant has a trial by jury, the jury, if it
485 finds the defendant guilty, shall also find a special verdict
486 as to whether or not the defendant committed the crime with a
487 sexual motivation.
488 (e) If there is a finding of sexual motivation, the
489 finding shall be made part of the record of conviction or
490 adjudication.
491 (f) For purposes of this section, sexual motivation
492 means that one of the purposes for which the defendant
493 committed the crime was for the purpose of the sexual
494 gratification of the defendant.
495 (g) This section shall not apply to sex offenses as
496 defined in subdivisions (1) to (40)(41), inclusive, of Section
497 15-20A-5."
498 "§15-20A-44
499 (a) The Secretary of the Alabama State Law Enforcement
500 Agency shall adopt rules establishing an administrative
501 hearing for persons who are only made subject to this chapter
502 pursuant to subdivision (35)(36) of Section 15-20A-5.
503 (b) The Secretary of the Alabama State Law Enforcement
504 Agency shall adopt rules setting forth a listing of offenses
Page 18

Agency shall adopt rules setting forth a listing of offenses
SB203 Enrolled
505 from other jurisdictions that are to be considered criminal
506 sex offenses under subdivision (35)(36) of Section 15-20A-5.
507 Thereafter, any individual convicted of any offense set forth
508 in the listing shall immediately be subject to this chapter
509 and shall not be entitled to an administrative hearing as
510 provided in subsection (a).
511 (c) The Secretary of the Alabama State Law Enforcement
512 Agency may adopt any rules as are necessary to implement and
513 enforce this chapter."
514 Section 6. Section 26-14-3, Code of Alabama 1975, is
515 amended to read as follows:
516
517 "§26-14-3
518 (a) All hospitals, clinics, sanitariums, doctors,
519 physicians, surgeons, medical examiners, coroners, dentists,
520 osteopaths, optometrists, chiropractors, podiatrists, physical
521 therapists, nurses, public and private K-12 employees, school
522 teachers and officials, peace officers, law enforcement
523 officials, pharmacists, social workers, day care workers or
524 employees, mental health professionals, employees of public
525 and private institutions of postsecondary and higher
526 education, members of the clergy as defined in Rule 505 of the
527 Alabama Rules of Evidence, or any other person called upon to
528 render aid or medical assistance to any child, when the child
529 is known or suspected to be a victim of child abuse or
530 neglect, shall be required to report orally, either by
531 telephone or direct communication immediately, and shall be
532 followed by a written report, to a duly constituted
Page 19

followed by a written report, to a duly constituted
SB203 Enrolled
533 authority.(1) An individual or entity identified in
534 subdivision (2) shall submit an oral report to a law
535 enforcement official or the Department of Human Resources
536 immediately upon knowing or suspecting that a child is a
537 victim of child abuse or neglect, receiving a report from a
538 third party that a child is or is suspected of being a victim
539 of child abuse or neglect, or obtaining any other information
540 that would lead a reasonable person to believe or suspect that
541 a child is a victim of child abuse or neglect. The individual
542 or entity shall submit an additional written report to the
543 official or department within 72 hours of the oral report.
544 (2) All of the following are subject to the
545 requirements of subdivision (1):
546 a. A hospital.
547 b. A clinic.
548 c. A sanitarium.
549 d. A doctor.
550 e. A physician.
551 f. A surgeon.
552 g. A medical examiner.
553 h. A coroner.
554 i. A dentist.
555 j. An osteopath.
556 k. An optometrist.
557 l. A chiropractor.
558 m. A podiatrist.
559 n. A physical therapist.
560 o. A nurse.
Page 20

o. A nurse.
SB203 Enrolled
561 p. A public or private K-12 school employee.
562 q. A school teacher.
563 r. A school official.
564 s. A peace officer.
565 t. A law enforcement official.
566 u. A pharmacist.
567 v. A social worker.
568 w. A day care worker or employee.
569 x. A mental health professional.
570 y. An employee of a public or private institution of
571 postsecondary or higher education.
572 z. A member of the clergy as defined in Rule 505 of the
573 Alabama Rules of Evidence.
574 aa. Any other person called upon to render aid or
575 medical assistance to any child.
576 (b)(1) When an initial Immediately upon the receipt of
577 a report is made to a law enforcement officialpursuant to
578 subsection (a), the law enforcement official subsequently
579 shall inform the Department of Human Resources of the report
580 so that the department can carry out its responsibility to
581 provide protective services when deemed appropriate to the
582 respective child or children.
583 (2) As soon as is practicable after the receipt of a
584 report of known or suspected child abuse or neglect is made
585 pursuant to subsection (a), the Department of Human Resources
586 shall make efforts to determine the military status of the
587 parent or guardian of the child who is the subject of the
588 child abuse or neglect allegation.
Page 21

child abuse or neglect allegation.
SB203 Enrolled
589 (3) If the Department of Human Resources determines
590 that a parent or guardian under subdivision (2) is in the
591 military, the department shall notify a United States
592 Department of Defense family advocacy program at the military
593 installation of the parent or guardianguardian's military
594 installation that there is an allegation of child abuse or
595 neglect that is being investigated that which involves a child
596 of the military parent or guardian.
597 (c) When the Department of Human Resources receives
598 initial reports of suspected abuse or neglect, as defined in
599 Section 26-14-1, including suspected abuse or neglect
600 involving discipline or corporal punishment committed in a
601 public or private school or suspected abuse or neglect in a
602 state-operated child residential facility, the Department of
603 Human Resources shall transmit a copy of school reports to the
604 law enforcement agency and or residential facility reports to
605 the law enforcement agency and the operating state agency
606 which shall conduct the investigation. When the investigation
607 is completed, a written report of the completed investigation
608 shall contain containing the information required by the
609 stateState Department of Human Resources which shall be
610 submitted by the law enforcement agency or the state agency to
611 the county department of human resources for entry into the
612 state's central registry.
613 (d) Nothing in this chapter shall preclude interagency
614 agreements between departments of human resources, law
615 enforcement, and or any other state agencies on procedures for
616 investigating reports of suspected child abuse and neglect to
Page 22

investigating reports of suspected child abuse and neglect to
SB203 Enrolled
617 provide for departments of human resources to assist law
618 enforcement and or other state agencies in these
619 investigations.
620 (e) Any provision of this section to the contrary
621 notwithstanding, if any agency or authority investigates any
622 report pursuant to this section and the report does not result
623 in a conviction, the agency or authority shall expunge any
624 record of the information or report and any data developed
625 from the record.
626 (f)(e) Subsection (a) to the contrary notwithstanding,
627 a member of the clergy shall not be required to report
628 information gained solely in a confidential communication
629 privileged pursuant to Rule 505 of the Alabama Rules of
630 Evidence, which and the communication shall continue to be
631 privileged as provided by law.
632 (g)(f)(1) Commencing on August 1, 2013, a public or
633 private employer who discharges, suspends, disciplines, or
634 penalizes an employee solely for reporting suspected child
635 abuse or neglect pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a
636 Class C misdemeanor.
637 (2) A violation of subdivision (1) following a previous
638 conviction for a violation of subdivision (1) shall be a Class
639 C felony.
640 (g)(1) A misdemeanor prosecution for a violation of
641 this section must be commenced within 12 months after the
642 violation was first reported to a law enforcement agency.
643 (2) A felony prosecution for a violation of this
644 section must be commenced within five years after the
Page 23

section must be commenced within five years after the
SB203 Enrolled
645 violation was first reported to a law enforcement agency."
646 Section 7. This act shall become effective on October
647 1, 2026.
Page 24

1, 2026.
SB203 Enrolled
648
649
650
651
652
653
654 ________________________________________________
655 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
656
657
658
659 ________________________________________________
660 Speaker of the House of Representatives
661
662
663 SB203
664 Senate 05-Feb-26
665 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
666 the Senate, as amended.
667
668 Patrick Harris,
669 Secretary.
670
671
672
673
674 House of Representatives
675 Amended and passed: 31-Mar-26
676
677
678
679
680 Senate concurred in House amendment 01-Apr-26
681
682
683
684
685 By: Senator Figures
Page 25